static/hunspell/28.01.2024/bash.aff
FLAG num
SFX 103 Y 210 # существительные Noun
SFX 103 0 лыҡ/107 . +Der/лыҡ
SFX 103 0 лан/215 . +Der/ла+Pass
SFX 103 0 лар/115 [^гкп] +Pl
SFX 103 0 лар/115 [^н]г +Pl
SFX 103 0 лар/115 [^нс]к +Pl
SFX 103 0 лар/115 [^м]п +Pl
SFX 103 0 лар/115 [^а]мп +Pl
SFX 103 0 ылар/115 [н][гк] +Pl
SFX 103 0 ылар/115 [с][к] +Pl
SFX 103 0 ылар/115 [а][м][п] +Pl
SFX 103 0 ның/117 [^гкп] +Gen
SFX 103 0 ның/117 [^н]г +Gen
SFX 103 0 ның/117 [^нс]к +Gen
SFX 103 0 ның/117 [^м]п +Gen
SFX 103 0 ның/117 [^а]мп +Gen
SFX 103 0 ының/117 [н][гк] +Gen
SFX 103 0 ының/117 [с][к] +Gen
SFX 103 0 ының/117 [а][м][п] +Gen
SFX 103 0 ға/121 [^гкп] +Dat
SFX 103 0 ға/121 [^н]г +Dat
SFX 103 0 ға/121 [^нс]к +Dat
SFX 103 0 ға/121 [^м]п +Dat
SFX 103 0 ға/121 [^а]мп +Dat
SFX 103 0 ыға/121 [н][гк] +Dat
SFX 103 0 ыға/121 [с][к] +Dat
SFX 103 0 ыға/121 [а][м][п] +Dat
SFX 103 0 ғараҡ [^гкп] +Dat+Comp
SFX 103 0 ғараҡ [^н]г +Dat+Comp
SFX 103 0 ғараҡ [^нс]к +Dat+Comp
SFX 103 0 ғараҡ [^м]п +Dat+Comp
SFX 103 0 ғараҡ [^а]мп +Dat+Comp
SFX 103 0 ығараҡ [н][гк] +Dat+Comp
SFX 103 0 ығараҡ [с][к] +Dat+Comp
SFX 103 0 ығараҡ [а][м][п] +Dat+Comp
SFX 103 0 ны/121 [^гкп] +Acc
SFX 103 0 ны/121 [^н]г +Acc
SFX 103 0 ны/121 [^нс]к +Acc
SFX 103 0 ны/121 [^м]п +Acc
SFX 103 0 ны/121 [^а]мп +Acc
SFX 103 0 ыны/121 [н][гк] +Acc
SFX 103 0 ыны/121 [с][к] +Acc
SFX 103 0 ыны/121 [а][м][п] +Acc
SFX 103 0 нан/117 [^гкп] +Abl
SFX 103 0 нан/117 [^н]г +Abl
SFX 103 0 нан/117 [^нс]к +Abl
SFX 103 0 нан/117 [^м]п +Abl
SFX 103 0 нан/117 [^а]мп +Abl
SFX 103 0 ынан/117 [н][гк] +Abl
SFX 103 0 ынан/117 [с][к] +Abl
SFX 103 0 ынан/117 [а][м][п] +Abl
SFX 103 0 ла/121 [^гкп] +Loc
SFX 103 0 ла/121 [^н]г +Loc
SFX 103 0 ла/121 [^нс]к +Loc
SFX 103 0 ла/121 [^м]п +Loc
SFX 103 0 ла/121 [^а]мп +Loc
SFX 103 0 ыла/121 [н][гк] +Loc
SFX 103 0 ыла/121 [с][к] +Loc
SFX 103 0 ыла/121 [а][м][п] +Loc
SFX 103 0 лараҡ [^гкп] +Loc+Comp
SFX 103 0 лараҡ [^н]г +Loc+Comp
SFX 103 0 лараҡ [^нс]к +Loc+Comp
SFX 103 0 лараҡ [^м]п +Loc+Comp
SFX 103 0 лараҡ [^а]мп +Loc+Comp
SFX 103 0 ылараҡ [н][гк] +Loc+Comp
SFX 103 0 ылараҡ [с][к] +Loc+Comp
SFX 103 0 ылараҡ [а][м][п] +Loc+Comp
SFX 103 0 мын/126 [^гкп] +Pred1Sg
SFX 103 0 мын/126 [^н]г +Pred1Sg
SFX 103 0 мын/126 [^нс]к +Pred1Sg
SFX 103 0 мын/126 [^м]п +Pred1Sg
SFX 103 0 мын/126 [^а]мп +Pred1Sg
SFX 103 0 ымын/126 [н][гк] +Pred1Sg
SFX 103 0 ымын/126 [с][к] +Pred1Sg
SFX 103 0 ымын/126 [а][м][п] +Pred1Sg
SFX 103 0 һың/126 [^гкп] +Pred2Sg
SFX 103 0 һың/126 [^н]г +Pred2Sg
SFX 103 0 һың/126 [^нс]к +Pred2Sg
SFX 103 0 һың/126 [^м]п +Pred2Sg
SFX 103 0 һың/126 [^а]мп +Pred2Sg
SFX 103 0 ыһың/126 [н][гк] +Pred2Sg
SFX 103 0 ыһың/126 [с][к] +Pred2Sg
SFX 103 0 һың/126 [а][м][п] +Pred2Sg
SFX 103 0 быҙ/130 [^гкп] +Pred1Pl
SFX 103 0 быҙ/130 [^н]г +Pred1Pl
SFX 103 0 быҙ/130 [^нс]к +Pred1Pl
SFX 103 0 быҙ/130 [^м]п +Pred1Pl
SFX 103 0 быҙ/130 [^а]мп +Pred1Pl
SFX 103 0 ыбыҙ/130 [н][гк] +Pred1Pl
SFX 103 0 ыбыҙ/130 [с][к] +Pred1Pl
SFX 103 0 ыбыҙ/130 [а][м][п] +Pred1Pl
SFX 103 0 һығыҙ/130 [^гкп] +Pred2Pl
SFX 103 0 һығыҙ/130 [^н]г +Pred2Pl
SFX 103 0 һығыҙ/130 [^нс]к +Pred2Pl
SFX 103 0 һығыҙ/130 [^м]п +Pred2Pl
SFX 103 0 һығыҙ/130 [^а]мп +Pred2Pl
SFX 103 0 ыһығыҙ/130 [н][гк] +Pred2Pl
SFX 103 0 ыһығыҙ/130 [с][к] +Pred2Pl
SFX 103 0 ыһығыҙ/130 [а][м][п] +Pred2Pl
SFX 103 0 0/199 [^гкп]
SFX 103 0 0/199 [^н]г
SFX 103 0 0/199 [^нс]к
SFX 103 0 0/199 [^м]п
SFX 103 0 0/199 [^а]мп
SFX 103 0 0/195 [н][гк]
SFX 103 0 0/195 [с][к]
SFX 103 0 0/195 [а][м][п]
SFX 103 0 мы [^гкп] +Q
SFX 103 0 мы [^н]г +Q
SFX 103 0 мы [^нс]к +Q
SFX 103 0 мы [^м]п +Q
SFX 103 0 мы [^а]мп +Q
SFX 103 0 ымы [н][гк] +Q
SFX 103 0 ымы [с][к] +Q
SFX 103 0 ымы [а][м][п] +Q
SFX 103 0 мылыр [^гкп] +Q+Indf
SFX 103 0 мылыр [^н]г +Q+Indf
SFX 103 0 мылыр [^нс]к +Q+Indf
SFX 103 0 мылыр [^м]п +Q+Indf
SFX 103 0 мылыр [^а]мп +Q+Indf
SFX 103 0 ымылыр [н][гк] +Q+Indf
SFX 103 0 ымылыр [с][к] +Q+Indf
SFX 103 0 ымылыр [а][м][п] +Q+Indf
SFX 103 0 лыр [^гкп] +Indf
SFX 103 0 лыр [^н]г +Indf
SFX 103 0 лыр [^нс]к +Indf
SFX 103 0 лыр [^м]п +Indf
SFX 103 0 лыр [^а]мп +Indf
SFX 103 0 ылыр [н][гк] +Indf
SFX 103 0 ылыр [с][к] +Indf
SFX 103 0 ылыр [а][м][п] +Indf
SFX 103 0 сы [^гкп] +Clt/сы
SFX 103 0 сы [^н]г +Clt/сы
SFX 103 0 сы [^нс]к +Clt/сы
SFX 103 0 сы [^м]п +Clt/сы
SFX 103 0 сы [^а]мп +Clt/сы
SFX 103 0 ысы [н][гк] +Clt/сы
SFX 103 0 ысы [с][к] +Clt/сы
SFX 103 0 ысы [а][м][п] +Clt/сы
SFX 103 0 ныҡы/135 [^гкп] +Poss
SFX 103 0 ныҡы/135 [^н]г +Poss
SFX 103 0 ныҡы/135 [^нс]к +Poss
SFX 103 0 ныҡы/135 [^м]п +Poss
SFX 103 0 ныҡы/135 [^а]мп +Poss
SFX 103 0 ыныҡы/135 [н][гк] +Poss
SFX 103 0 ыныҡы/135 [с][к] +Poss
SFX 103 0 ыныҡы/135 [а][м][п] +Poss
SFX 103 0 ҡай/139 [^гкп] +Dim
SFX 103 0 ҡай/139 [^н]г +Dim
SFX 103 0 ҡай/139 [^нс]к +Dim
SFX 103 0 ҡай/139 [^м]п +Dim
SFX 103 0 ҡай/139 [^а]мп +Dim
SFX 103 0 ыҡай/139 [н][гк] +Dim
SFX 103 0 ыҡай/139 [с][к] +Dim
SFX 103 0 ыҡай/139 [а][м][п] +Dim
SFX 103 0 лай/141 [^гкп] +Der/дай
SFX 103 0 лай/141 [^н]г +Der/дай
SFX 103 0 лай/141 [^нс]к +Der/дай
SFX 103 0 лай/141 [^м]п +Der/дай
SFX 103 0 лай/141 [^а]мп +Der/дай
SFX 103 0 ылай/141 [н][гк] +Der/дай
SFX 103 0 ылай/141 [с][к] +Der/дай
SFX 103 0 ылай/141 [а][м][п] +Der/дай
SFX 103 0 са/143 [^гкп] +Der/са
SFX 103 0 са/143 [^н]г +Der/са
SFX 103 0 са/143 [^нс]к +Der/са
SFX 103 0 са/143 [^м]п +Der/са
SFX 103 0 са/143 [^а]мп +Der/са
SFX 103 0 ыса/143 [н][гк] +Der/са
SFX 103 0 ыса/143 [с][к] +Der/са
SFX 103 0 ыса/143 [а][м][п] +Der/са
SFX 103 0 лағы/145 [^гкп] +Der/дағы
SFX 103 0 лағы/145 [^н]г +Der/дағы
SFX 103 0 лағы/145 [^нс]к +Der/дағы
SFX 103 0 лағы/145 [^м]п +Der/дағы
SFX 103 0 лағы/145 [^а]мп +Der/дағы
SFX 103 0 ылағы/145 [н][гк] +Der/дағы
SFX 103 0 ылағы/145 [с][к] +Der/дағы
SFX 103 0 ылағы/145 [а][м][п] +Der/дағы
SFX 103 0 лағылар/115 [^гкп] +Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 103 0 лағылар/115 [^н]г +Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 103 0 лағылар/115 [^нс]к +Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 103 0 лағылар/115 [^м]п +Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 103 0 лағылар/115 [^а]мп +Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 103 0 ылағылар/115 [н][гк] +Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 103 0 ылағылар/115 [с][к] +Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 103 0 ылағылар/115 [а][м][п] +Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 103 0 лы/147 [^гкп] +Der/лы
SFX 103 0 лы/147 [^н]г +Der/лы
SFX 103 0 лы/147 [^нс]к +Der/лы
SFX 103 0 лы/147 [^м]п +Der/лы
SFX 103 0 лы/147 [^а]мп +Der/лы
SFX 103 0 ылы/147 [н][гк] +Der/лы
SFX 103 0 ылы/147 [с][к] +Der/лы
SFX 103 0 ылы/147 [а][м][п] +Der/лы
SFX 103 0 һыҙ/151 [^гкп] +Abe
SFX 103 0 һыҙ/151 [^н]г +Abe
SFX 103 0 һыҙ/151 [^нс]к +Abe
SFX 103 0 һыҙ/151 [^м]п +Abe
SFX 103 0 һыҙ/151 [^а]мп +Abe
SFX 103 0 ыһыҙ/151 [н][гк] +Abe
SFX 103 0 ыһыҙ/151 [с][к] +Abe
SFX 103 0 ыһыҙ/151 [а][м][п] +Abe
SFX 103 0 ғаса/155 [^гкп] +Der/ҡаса
SFX 103 0 ғаса/155 [^н]г +Der/ҡаса
SFX 103 0 ғаса/155 [^нс]к +Der/ҡаса
SFX 103 0 ғаса/155 [^м]п +Der/ҡаса
SFX 103 0 ғаса/155 [^а]мп +Der/ҡаса
SFX 103 0 ығаса/155 [н][гк] +Der/ҡаса
SFX 103 0 ығаса/155 [с][к] +Der/ҡаса
SFX 103 0 ығаса/155 [а][м][п] +Der/ҡаса

SFX 104 Y 28 # существительные Noun
SFX 104 0 лек/108 . +Der/лыҡ
SFX 104 0 лән/216 . +Der/ла+Pass
SFX 104 0 ләр/116 . +Pl
SFX 104 0 нең/118 . +Gen
SFX 104 0 гә/122 . +Dat
SFX 104 0 гәрәк . +Dat+Comp
SFX 104 0 не/122 . +Acc
SFX 104 0 нән/118 . +Abl
SFX 104 0 лә/122 . +Loc
SFX 104 0 ләрәк . +Loc+Comp
SFX 104 0 мен/127 . +Pred1Sg
SFX 104 0 һең/127 . +Pred2Sg
SFX 104 0 беҙ/131 . +Pred1Pl
SFX 104 0 һегеҙ/131 . +Pred2Pl
SFX 104 0 0/200 .
SFX 104 0 ме . +Q
SFX 104 0 мелер . +Q+Indf
SFX 104 0 лер . +Indf
SFX 104 0 се . +Clt/сы
SFX 104 0 неке/136 . +Poss
SFX 104 0 кәй/140 . +Dim
SFX 104 0 ләй/142 . +Der/дай
SFX 104 0 сә/144 . +Der/са
SFX 104 0 ләге/146 . +Der/дағы
SFX 104 0 ләгеләр/116 . +Der/дағы+Pl
SFX 104 0 ле/148 . +Der/лы
SFX 104 0 һеҙ/152 . +Abe
SFX 104 0 гәсә/156 . +Der/ҡаса
