static/hunspell/28.01.2024/bash.dic
ҡоралторба/103	[Noun]
омега/103	[Noun]
хәрәкәт-ваҡиға/103	[Noun]
ҡуяға/103	[Noun]
анда/85,103	[Pron]
башҡоҙа/103	[Noun]
фраза/103	[Noun]
яза/103	[Noun]
антоновка/103	[Noun]
геолого-разведка/103	[Noun]
методика/103	[Noun]
хроника/103	[Noun]
астронавтика/103	[Noun]
гимнастика/103	[Noun]
бейсболка/103	[Noun]
казарка/103	[Noun]
слитка/103	[Noun]
тумаҡа/103	[Noun]
шыбала/103	[Noun]
сула/103	[Noun]
видеояҙма/103	[Noun]
спектрограмма/103	[Noun]
оносма/103	[Noun]
һырахана/103	[Noun]
платина/103	[Noun]
ҡолпа/103	[Noun]
мадера/103	[Noun]
әйбер-ҡура/103	[Noun]
һаласа/103	[Noun]
тупса/103	[Noun]
газета/103	[Noun]
супрапорта/103	[Noun]
тупһа/103	[Noun]
крекинг/103	[Noun]
тиҙлеге/104	[Noun]
кәйге/104	[Noun]
удэге/104	[Noun]
теләге/104	[Noun]
еде/104	[Noun]
серҙе/104	[Noun]
агропредприятие/103	[Noun]
мейе/104	[Noun]
һинеке/86,104	[Pron]
сәпке/104	[Noun]
керешке/104	[Noun]
киле/104	[Noun]
сүле/104	[Noun]
әреме/104	[Noun]
дине/104	[Noun]
тәне/104	[Noun]
килере/104	[Noun]
телдәре/104	[Noun]
өйрәктәре/104	[Noun]
сәпәүесе/104	[Noun]
шәреҡсе/104	[Noun]
күскенсе/104	[Noun]
һәрәпсе/104	[Noun]
кәртсе/104	[Noun]
тәьминәтсе/104	[Noun]
егеүсе/104	[Noun]
үлтереүсе/104	[Noun]
һөйөүсе/104	[Noun]
билдәләүсе/104	[Noun]
мәҙхиәсе/104	[Noun]
биҙрәсе/104	[Noun]
ирәкте/104	[Noun]
сүрәте/104	[Noun]
сереткеһе/104	[Noun]
билдәһе/104	[Noun]
тәржемәһе/104	[Noun]
күрәһе/104	[Noun]
беше/104	[Noun]
шәше/104	[Noun]
агропроизводство/103	[Noun]
инкассо/103	[Noun]
сәжғы/103	[Noun]
һуйынды/103	[Noun]
ҡырасҡы/103	[Noun]
баҫыулы/103	[Noun]
бары/85,103	[Pron]
командировкасы/103	[Noun]
водопроводсы/103	[Noun]
футболсы/103	[Noun]
һауынсы/103	[Noun]
фольклорсы/103	[Noun]
шифрлаусы/103	[Noun]
яусы/103	[Noun]
йырынты/103	[Noun]
ҡапҡаһы/103	[Noun]
һарыһы/103	[Noun]
сөбә/104	[Noun]
тәбә/104	[Noun]
мүлдергә/104	[Noun]
ҡәлғә/104	[Noun]
бәндә/104	[Noun]
ебәҙә/104	[Noun]
зәмзә/104	[Noun]
әһлиә/104	[Noun]
кейә/104	[Noun]
бәйә/104	[Noun]
көмөшбикә/104	[Noun]
кәрзинкә/104	[Noun]
мунтәңкә/104	[Noun]
һеркә/104	[Noun]
иренсәскә/104	[Noun]
мешкә/104	[Noun]
мулдәкә/104	[Noun]
ризыҡ-нәфәкә/104	[Noun]
наргилә/104	[Noun]
аллаһүлә/104	[Noun]
йәнәлә/104	[Noun]
рөхсәтнамә/104	[Noun]
нимә-нимә/86,104	[Pron]
төйөлмә/104	[Noun]
бирмә/104	[Noun]
китмә/104	[Noun]
төнәтмә/104	[Noun]
билдәмә/104	[Noun]
сүпләмә/104	[Noun]
ҡәйенйеҙнә/104	[Noun]
яу-фетнә/104	[Noun]
йөрәнә/104	[Noun]
садарә/104	[Noun]
жәзирә/104	[Noun]
түпрә/104	[Noun]
ҡушыҡ-гәрә/104	[Noun]
кәлисә/104	[Noun]
билсә/104	[Noun]
әпсә/104	[Noun]
бәсә/104	[Noun]
ҡартәсә/104	[Noun]
һикәлтә/104	[Noun]
йорт-кәртә/104	[Noun]
лөҡҡәтә/104	[Noun]
ғиләүә/104	[Noun]
үләкһә/104	[Noun]
миршә/104	[Noun]
себорея/103	[Noun]
нанотехнология/103	[Noun]
стенокардия/103	[Noun]
кавернотомия/103	[Noun]
рупия/103	[Noun]
малярия/103	[Noun]
ксилография/103	[Noun]
колонизация/103	[Noun]
интонация/103	[Noun]
консультация/103	[Noun]
интервенция/103	[Noun]
конюшня/103	[Noun]
Вацлава/54,103	[N+Prop]
Илбуға/55,103	[N+Prop]
Лобода/53,103	[N+Prop]
Айытҡужа/55,103	[N+Prop]
Пуговка/53,103	[N+Prop]
Чимка/54,103	[N+Prop]
Алешка/54,103	[N+Prop]
Феофила/54,103	[N+Prop]
Мөхәмәтулла/55,103	[N+Prop]
Серафима/54,103	[N+Prop]
Себина/54,103	[N+Prop]
Иванна/54,103	[N+Prop]
Заряна/54,103	[N+Prop]
Миңлесабира/56,103	[N+Prop]
Аҡсура/55,103	[N+Prop]
Крыса/53,103	[N+Prop]
Бахта/54,103	[N+Prop]
Шипица/53,103	[N+Prop]
Фарухша/55,103	[N+Prop]
Махизаде/53,103	[N+Prop]
Абызгилде/55,104	[N+Prop]
Муллабирҙе/55,104	[N+Prop]
Хәже/55,104	[N+Prop]
Беке/53,103	[N+Prop]
Ҡолғәле/55,104	[N+Prop]
Ишғәле/55,104	[N+Prop]
Гарпе/53,103	[N+Prop]
Пашалче/54,103	[N+Prop]
Вирго/53,103	[N+Prop]
Снижко/53,103	[N+Prop]
Дубенко/53,103	[N+Prop]
Морозенко/53,103	[N+Prop]
Вакуленко/53,103	[N+Prop]
Ковтуненко/53,103	[N+Prop]
Буренко/53,103	[N+Prop]
Тиценко/53,103	[N+Prop]
Скрипниченко/53,103	[N+Prop]
Братченко/53,103	[N+Prop]
Евтушенко/53,103	[N+Prop]
Сыпко/53,103	[N+Prop]
Полишко/53,103	[N+Prop]
Шматько/53,103	[N+Prop]
Сан-Стефано/191,103	[N+Prop]
Нове-Место/191,103	[N+Prop]
Вәзиғә/56,104	[N+Prop]
Фәниҙә/56,104	[N+Prop]
Зөбәйҙә/56,104	[N+Prop]
Хәмзә/55,104	[N+Prop]
Рәмзиә/56,104	[N+Prop]
Физәлиә/56,104	[N+Prop]
Бәҙәниә/56,104	[N+Prop]
Нәсиә/56,104	[N+Prop]
Зийә/55,104	[N+Prop]
Аҡбикә/56,104	[N+Prop]
Именбикә/56,104	[N+Prop]
Һылыубикә/56,104	[N+Prop]
Камилә/56,104	[N+Prop]
Әсмә/56,104	[N+Prop]
Фәрзәнә/56,104	[N+Prop]
Мәстүрә/56,104	[N+Prop]
Миңлеғәрифә/56,104	[N+Prop]
Аню/54,103	[N+Prop]
Алия/54,103	[N+Prop]
Раисия/54,103	[N+Prop]
Драбеня/53,103	[N+Prop]
Анастасья/54,103	[N+Prop]
